Massachusetts, session 194th, S1594.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 9 of chapter 19D of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2014
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after clause (18)(b) the following clause: (19) in
the case of a resident suffering from Alzheimer's, dementia, or other psychiatric illnesses,
facilities are prohibited from transferring patients off-premises for medication adjustments
without the approval of the patient, guardian, or person legally responsible for the patient.
SECTION 2. Section 70E of chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2014
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after clause (o) the following clause: (p)in the
case of a resident suffering from Alzheimer's, dementia, or other psychiatric illnesses, facilities
are prohibited from transferring patients off-premises for medication adjustments without the
approval of the patient, guardian, or person legally responsible for the patient.
of 1